Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-3701
Mobile home, defined.

For purposes of sections 77-3701 to 77-3708, unless the context otherwise requires, mobile home shall mean every portable or relocatable device of any description, without motive power, and designed for living quarters, whether or not permanently attached to the land, but shall not include a cabin trailer registered for operation upon the highways of this state.

Laws 1981, LB 168, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 195;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 166.